Georgia statutes. TITLE 52 Waters of the State, Ports, and Watercraft
CHAPTER 5 Navigation Companies

Cross references.

Corporations generally, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V and T. 14, C. 4.

52-5-1.
Granting of corporate powers and privileges by Secretary of State.

All corporate powers and privileges to navigation companies shall be issued and granted by the Secretary of State upon the terms, liabilities, and restrictions and subject to all the provisions of this chapter and the Constitution of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 71, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2147; Civil Code 1910, § 2565; Code 1933, § 17-201.

Cross references.

Grant of corporate powers generally, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

Corporate powers to navigation companies granted by Secretary of State, §

14-5-2

.

Corporate powers generally, §

14-4-60

.

52-5-2.
Filing of petition for incorporation; contents of petition; attachment of affidavit of incorporators; endorsement, recordation, and filing of petitions by Secretary of State.

Any five or more natural persons may act as incorporators of a corporation to be organized under this chapter by filing a petition in writing, addressed to the Secretary of State, in which shall be stated the names and residences of each of the persons desiring to form the corporation, the name of the navigation company they desire to have incorporated, the amount of the proposed capital stock, the number of years it is to continue, the place where its principal office is to be located, a request to be incorporated under the laws of this state, and that they have given four weeks’ notice of their intention to apply for the charter by publication of the petition in one of the newspapers in which the sheriff’s advertisements are published for the county once a week for four weeks before filing the petition. There shall be annexed to the petition an affidavit, made by at least three of the persons forming the company, that the names subscribed are the genuine signatures of the persons named therein and that the facts stated in the petition are true to the best of their knowledge, information, and belief. The petition for incorporation, thus sworn to, shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, who shall endorse thereon the date of filing and record the same in a book to be kept by him for that purpose, which shall be open to the inspection of the public at all times during the office hours of the Secretary of State.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 71, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 2148; Civil Code 1910, § 2566; Code 1933, § 17-202.

52-5-3.
Issuance of certificate of incorporation generally.

When the petition shall have been filed with the Secretary of State, he shall issue to the company, under the great seal of the state, the following form of certificate:

“To all to whom these presents may come — Greetings:

Whereas, in pursuance of an Act of the General Assembly of Georgia, approved December 6, 1894, and (naming the persons who signed the petition) having filed in the office of the Secretary of State a certain petition seeking the formation of a corporation to be known as (here insert corporate name), with a capital stock of $ _______________ , for the purpose of owning, constructing, equipping, maintaining, and operating vessels, steamboats, and all other watercraft to be engaged in navigation, and having complied with the statutes in such cases made and provided; therefore, the State of Georgia hereby grants unto the above-named persons, their successors, and assigns full authority, by and under the said name of
_______________ , to exercise the powers and privileges of a corporation for the purposes above-stated, subject to the Constitution of this state and all laws governing such navigation companies of force at the date of the granting of this certificate or that may hereafter become of force, either by constitutional or statute law.

In witness whereof, these presents have been signed by the Secretary of State, and to which is annexed the great seal of the State of Georgia, at Atlanta, Georgia, this
_______________
day of
_______________ ,
_______________ .”

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 71, § 3; Civil Code 1895, § 2149; Civil Code 1910, § 2567; Code 1933, § 17-203; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 67; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 52.

52-5-4.
Time of commencement of corporate existence; payment of fee for issuance of certificate.

When the Secretary of State issues a certificate of incorporation, the persons who signed the petition described in Code Section 52-5-2 and all persons who shall become stockholders in such company shall be a corporation by the name specified in the petition and certificate and shall possess the powers and privileges and be subject to the provisions contained in this chapter. Before the Secretary of State shall issue the certificate, the petitioners shall pay the fee prescribed in Code Section 14-4-183.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 71, § 3; Civil Code 1895, § 2150; Civil Code 1910, § 2568; Code 1933, § 17-204.

52-5-5.
Duty of Secretary of State to assure company’s compliance with chapter prior to issuance of certificate; certificate as constituting evidence of corporation’s existence and compliance with chapter.

Before the Secretary of State shall issue the certificate, he shall satisfy himself that all the requirements of Code Section 52-5-2 have been substantially complied with. Any certificate or duplicate thereof issued by the Secretary of State shall be conclusive evidence of the existence of such corporation in all the courts and places in this state and of a compliance with all the requirements of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 71, § 4; Civil Code 1895, § 2151; Civil Code 1910, § 2569; Code 1933, § 17-205.

52-5-6.
Organization of company; quorum; election of first board of directors; qualifications of directors; election and appointment of officers and agents; annual election of, and filling of vacancies on, board of directors.

When the amount of capital stock has been subscribed, the persons named in the certificate of incorporation, or a majority of them, are authorized to call a meeting of the stockholders for the purpose of organization, which meeting shall be held in the city or other place where the principal office of the company shall be located, and of which meeting notice shall have been given as provided in this chapter. At the meeting, at which a majority of stock subscribed shall constitute a quorum, there shall be elected a board of directors of not less than three to manage the affairs of the company, each share of stock to be entitled to one vote and a plurality of votes cast being necessary to elect. The persons so elected shall continue in office until relieved by their successors. No person shall be a director in the company unless he is a stockholder; and a majority of the directors must be citizens of this state. The board of directors shall select from their number a president, may elect one or more vice-presidents, and may appoint a secretary, a treasurer, and such other officers, agents, and servants as they may deem necessary. The regular election of directors shall be held annually at the principal office of the company. Vacancies occasioned by death, resignation, or otherwise shall be filled in such manner as shall be provided by the bylaws of the company.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 71, § 5; Civil Code 1895, § 2153; Civil Code 1910, § 2571; Ga. L. 1913, p. 51, § 1; Code 1933, § 17-207; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 52.

52-5-7.
Opening books of subscription for capital stock; restriction on increase of capital stock.

When the certificate has been issued, the persons named therein, in case they shall not have subscribed for the entire capital stock, may open books of subscription to complete the subscription to the capital stock of the company, in such manner and for such amount per share as they may deem proper and expedient, and may receive the subscriptions until the entire capital stock is subscribed. In no case shall the capital stock be increased except as provided in this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 71, § 4; Civil Code 1895, § 2152; Civil Code 1910, § 2570; Code 1933, § 17-206.

52-5-8.
Manner of payment for stock; auction sale of stock upon default by subscriber; giving delinquent subscriber notice of auction sale.

The directors may require the subscribers to the capital stock to pay the amounts variously subscribed by them in such installments as they may deem proper. The directors may receive cash or property, real or personal, at the agreed value thereof in the payment of such installments. If any subscriber shall neglect to pay any installments as required by resolution of the board of directors, the directors may direct an action to be brought against him forthwith for the amount of the call. Alternatively, after 30 days’ notice to the stockholder, the board of directors may, in its discretion, cause his stock to be sold at auction to the highest bidder for cash. Any deficiency in the sum thus realized necessary to make the amount of the call shall be made good by the delinquent. Any surplus over the amount of the call and the expenses of the sale shall be paid over to him. A certificate of stock shall be issued to the purchaser and he shall stand in the same relation to the company as the delinquent would have, had he not so made default. Such sale shall be in the city or other place where the principal office of the company is located, at such time and place as the directors may prescribe. If for any reason it is not practicable to serve the delinquent stockholder with notice of the sale, personally or by mail, or if he is a nonresident of this state, then notice may be given him of the sale by publication in the newspaper in which sheriff’s advertisements are published in the county of its principal office, once a week for four weeks prior to the date of the sale.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 71, § 6; Civil Code 1895, § 2154; Civil Code 1910, § 2572; Code 1933, § 17-209; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 52.

52-5-9.
Stock as constituting personal property; determination of manner of transfer of stock.

The stock in the company shall be deemed personal property and shall be transferable in such manner as may be prescribed by the bylaws of the company.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 71, § 7; Civil Code 1895, § 2155; Civil Code 1910, § 2573; Code 1933, § 17-210.

Cross references.

Consideration of stocks as personalty, §

44-1-3

.

52-5-10.
Procedure for increase of capital stock.

A company desiring to have its capital stock increased shall:

File in the office of the Secretary of State a petition signed with the corporate name, stating:

The name and character of the corporation;

The date of its original charter and all amendments thereto; and

That it desires to amend the company’s charter to increase its capital stock;

File, along with the petition called for in paragraph (1) of this subsection:

A certified abstract from the minutes of the board of directors showing that the application for the proposed increase in capital stock has been authorized by the vote of a majority of the stockholders of the entire capital stock entitled, by the terms of the corporation’s charter, to vote at an annual or special meeting called for that purpose, by a resolution of the board of directors; and

An affidavit showing that notice of such meeting was mailed to each stockholder or, in case of death, to the stockholder’s legal representatives or heirs at law, addressed to the stockholder’s last known residence, at least ten days prior to the day of the meeting.

The affidavit called for in subparagraph (a)(2)(B) of this Code section shall be made and signed in due form of law by the president or secretary of the company and shall show that the ten days’ notice has been published once a week for four weeks in the newspaper in which is published the sheriff’s sales of the county in which the principal office of the corporation desiring to increase its capital stock is located. The stock may be voted in person or by written proxy.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 71, § 7; Civil Code 1895, § 2156; Civil Code 1910, § 2574; Code 1933, § 17-211.

Cross references.

Certificate issued by the Secretary of State upon his approval of the corporation’s petition to increase its capital stock, §

14-4-121

.

52-5-11.
Powers of companies generally.

The company shall have the following powers:

To acquire, purchase, hold, and operate all such real and personal property as may be necessary or convenient for the maintenance and operation of its business and to accomplish the purposes of its organization;

To convey persons, vessels, and other property by the use of steam, sail, or other means and to receive compensation therefor; and to do all other things incident to a general navigation business, including the right to tow, assist, and rescue vessels;

To erect and maintain convenient buildings, wharves, docks, fixtures, and machinery for the accommodation and use of its passengers, freight, and other business;

To regulate the time and manner in which passengers, vessels, and other property shall be transported and the compensation to be paid therefor, subject to any existing law upon the subject; and

To borrow such sum or sums of money, at such rates of interest and upon such terms, as the company or its directors may agree upon and to execute trust deeds or mortgages, or both, if in their judgment the occasion may require it, for securing the payment thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 71, § 8; Civil Code 1895, § 2157; Civil Code 1910, § 2575; Code 1933, § 17-212.

Cross references.

Powers of corporations generally, §§

14-4-60

and

14-4-61

.

52-5-12.
Adoption of chapter by companies incorporated prior to April 1, 1969, and by persons otherwise owning or operating a navigation business.

Any navigation company incorporated prior to April 1, 1969, whether by the General Assembly or otherwise, may amend its charter by adopting the provisions of this chapter, by filing with the Secretary of State a petition signed with the corporate name, stating the name and character of the corporation, the date of the original Act of incorporation, and all amendments thereto. The company shall state in the petition that it desires to amend its charter by having granted to it the corporate powers and privileges granted to other navigation companies by this chapter. The company shall also file along with the petition a certified abstract from the minutes of the corporation, showing that the application for amendment has been authorized by resolution which has been duly adopted by the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the shares entitled to vote thereon of the corporation at a meeting held for the purpose of passing upon the resolution duly certified by the president and secretary of the corporation.

When a navigation company amends its charter by following the procedures specified in subsection (a) of this Code section, it may retain its original organization and the same amount of capital stock and other rights and privileges provided for in the original charter, except the right of exemption from taxation, which may not be in conflict with this chapter or any other law of this state relating to the powers and privileges of navigation corporations; and such amendments shall be without prejudice to any of the prior rights or contracts of the corporation.

This chapter may also be adopted by any person owning or operating a navigation business, without prejudice to such organization as may already have existed and without prejudice to his existing contracts and obligations. Whenever any person desires to adopt the provisions of this chapter as provided in this subsection, he shall file a petition with the Secretary of State setting forth with particularity in what manner it is desired to adopt this chapter. When such petition is filed, the Secretary of State shall issue to the person, under the great seal of the state, a certificate setting forth that this person is a body corporate with all the powers, duties, and liabilities of this chapter. Before the certificate shall be issued, the petitioner shall pay to the Secretary of State the fee provided in Code Section 14-4-183.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 71, § 9; Civil Code 1895, § 2158; Civil Code 1910, § 2576; Code 1933, § 17-213.

Cross references.

Petition for amendment of charter and the certificate issued upon approval of charter amendment or adoption of this chapter, §§

14-4-100

and

14-4-101

.

Fee for amendment of charter, §

14-4-183

.